Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.280

Medication, tests, treatments allowed.

It is not a violation of chapter 18.71 RCW or of chapter 18.57 RCW for a registered nurse, at or under the general direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, or osteopathic physician and surgeon, to administer prescribed drugs, injections, inoculations, tests, or treatment whether or not the piercing of tissues is involved.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 428.]